src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_KUÄSTTAD !!= * @CODE@ kuästtad:kuästt

! ** Yaml: __V-kuaeivvad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! kuästtad:kuästt
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: kuästtad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: kuästt
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kuästta
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kuasttu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: kuäst
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: kuästež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: kuästas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kuasttu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kuästtaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: kuästt»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1 kuästtad
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2 kuästt
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3 kuästta
:%^VOWRaise%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !4 kuasttu
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 kuäst-
+Pot+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>ež	K ; !6 kuästež
+Imprt+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7 kuästas
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8 kuasttu
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ; ! kuästt-
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn
+V: V0_MEINNAD ;
LEXICON IV_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn
+V+IV: V0_MEINNAD ;
LEXICON TV_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn
+V+TV: V0_MEINNAD ;
LEXICON V0_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn

! ** Yaml: __V-meinnad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! meinnad:meinn
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: meinnad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: meinn
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: meinna
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: meinnu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: meein
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: meeinež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: meeinas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: meinnu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: meinnaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: meinn»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1 meinnad
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2 meinn
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3 meinna
:%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ; !4 meinnu
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 meein-
+Pot+Sg3:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>ež	K ; !6 meeinež
+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7 meeinas
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8 meinnu
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ; ! meinn-
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

!! !CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_MUʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
+V: V0_MUʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_MUʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
+V+IV: V0_MUʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_MUʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
+V+TV: V0_MUʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_MUʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt

! seek parallel in RÕVVÂD
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: muʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mott
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: moʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3


!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:%^V2VV%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) muuʹtt-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: muuʹtt
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,


!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^V2VV%^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: moottas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: muttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: mottaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: muʹt»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; 


LEXICON V_LAʹDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
+V: V0_LAʹDDED ;
LEXICON IV_LAʹDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
+V+IV: V0_LAʹDDED ;
LEXICON TV_LAʹDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
+V+TV: V0_LAʹDDED ;
LEXICON V0_LAʹDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd

! seek parallel in VIǮǮÂD
! FORMS
!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: laʹdded
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lädd
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:%^V2VV%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) laaʹdd-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^V2VV%^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: laaʹdd
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^V2VV%^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: lääddas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: laddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: läddaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: laʹd»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_LIEʹĐĐED !!= * @CODE@ lieʹđđed:leâđđ
+V: V0_LIEʹĐĐED ;
LEXICON IV_LIEʹĐĐED !!= * @CODE@ lieʹđđed:leâđđ
+V+IV: V0_LIEʹĐĐED ;
LEXICON TV_LIEʹĐĐED !!= * @CODE@ lieʹđđed:leâđđ
+V+TV: V0_LIEʹĐĐED ;
LEXICON V0_LIEʹĐĐED !!= * @CODE@ lieʹđđed:leâđđ

!! like: V_JUEʹǨǨED
! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel shift
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) lieʹđđed 
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		!!= * @CODE@ (2) leâđđ
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALÄ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;     !!= * @CODE@ (3) leäʹđˈđe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) liõʹđˈđe
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) lieʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!!   Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 lieʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) leâđ-
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 liõđđu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ leâđˈđaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10) lieʹđ»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%>e»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;



LEXICON V_JUEʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâkk
+V: V0_JUEʹǨǨED ;
LEXICON IV_JUEʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâkk
+V+IV: V0_JUEʹǨǨED ;
LEXICON TV_JUEʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ jueʹǩǩed:juâkk
+V+TV: V0_JUEʹǨǨED ;
