src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
heibbad:heibb V_MEINNAD ;
heillad:heill V_MEINNAD ;
jueʹǩǩed:juâkk V_JUEʹǨǨED ;
kouddad:koudd V_MEINNAD ;
laʹdded:ladd V_LAʹDDED ;
leiggad:leigg V_MEINNAD ;
leivvad:leivv V_MEINNAD ;
leujjad:leujj V_MEINNAD ;
louddad:loudd V_MEINNAD ;
meiddad:meidd V_MEINNAD ;
meinnad:meinn V_MEINNAD ;
muʹtted:mutt V_MUʹTTED ;
neullad:neull V_MEINNAD ;
neurrad:neurr V_MEINNAD ;
njeiddad:njeidd V_MEINNAD ;
njeullad:njeull V_MEINNAD ;
njoikkad:njoikk V_MEINNAD ;
oiggad:oigg V_MEINNAD ;
peittad:peitt V_MEINNAD ;
preuggad:preugg V_MEINNAD ;
reiddad:reidd V_MEINNAD ;
seillad:seill V_MEINNAD ;
seivvad:seivv V_MEINNAD ;
seullad:seull V_MEINNAD ;
teivvad:teivv V_MEINNAD ;
toullad:toull V_MEINNAD ;
veinnad:veinn V_MEINNAD ;
vueʹtted:vuâtt V_JUEʹǨǨED ;
čueʹcced:čuâcc V_JUEʹǨǨED ;
šieʹtted:šeâtt V_LIEʹĐĐED ;
šmoiggad:šmoigg V_MEINNAD ;
špeiggad:špeigg V_MEINNAD ;
špoukkad:špoukk V_MEINNAD ;
ǩieʹlled:ǩeâll V_LIEʹĐĐED ;
